District of Columbia statutes.
38-755.04

Tracking and monitoring.

The Chancellor shall:

(1)

Track and monitor the preparedness of:

(A)

The early childhood population of children 3 and 4 years of age to determine the children’s readiness for entry and achievement in DCPS; and

(B)

Children in kindergarten through 3rd grade in DCPS to determine their readiness for entry and achievement in the 4th grade;

(2)

Develop a plan to address:

(A)

The early childhood population of children 3 and 4 years of age who are not ready for entry and achievement in DCPS; and

(B)

Children in kindergarten through 3rd grade in DCPS who are not ready for entry and achievement in the 4th grade;

(3)

Conduct readiness evaluations annually to ascertain whether:

(A)

Children 3 and 4 years of age are prepared for kindergarten; and

(B)

Children in the 3rd grade are prepared to be promoted to the 4th grade; and

(4)

Submit to the Council and the Mayor, by October 1 of each year:

(A)

The results of the readiness evaluations required by paragraph (3) of this section; and

(B)

A DCPS annual report for the preceding academic year delineating the progress and readiness of all students.

History

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 504, 59 DCR 3642